Oklahoma, session 2025, SB358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 104 of Title 66, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Hot bearings detector” means an infrared detector located


along railroad tracks to detect and alert the operators of a passing


train to any overheating of the train’s bearings, axles, or wheels;


and


2. “Main line” means a segment or route of railroad track of


any railroad over which five million (5,000,000) or more gross tons


of railroad traffic is transported annually as documented in


timetables filed with the Federal Railroad Administration. Main

Req. No. 1070 Page 1


line does not include tourist, scenic, historic, or excursion


operations.


B. Any person, firm, or corporation operating a train in this


state shall install and maintain a hot bearings detector system at


least every ten (10) miles along each main line.


C. The Department of Public Safety shall have the authority to


issue a citation to any person, firm, or corporation that violates


the provisions of this section. Such person, firm, or corporation


shall be subject to a fine not less than One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00) but not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1070 MSBB 1/3/2025 4:30:53 PM























Req. No. 1070 Page 2